src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON GUOKTELOGATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#logát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#logát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#logát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#logát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#logát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e%>#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:i%>n#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e%>#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#logát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#logát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#logát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#logát#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#lohki%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:e%>X4#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:e%>#logi%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%>#lot%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:i%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>X4#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:i%>X5jde#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jd9#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jgujn#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:i%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi%>X5jd K ; 
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e%>#logi%>X5jd K ; 
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e%>#logi%>X5jd K ; 
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e%>#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:e%>#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ; 
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#logi%>X5jd K ; 
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GOLBMALOGIOKTA
okta+Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi#okta%> K ;
okta+Num+Ess:%>#logi#okta%>n K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#okta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#ovtta»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#ovtta%>s K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#ovtta%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
okta+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#okti%>j K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#ovtta%>t K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#ovtta%>ide K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#ovtta%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIOKTA
okta+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#okta%> K ;
okta+Num+Ess:%>#logi#okta%>n K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#okta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#ovtta»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#ovtta%>s K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#ovtta%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
okta+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#okti%>j K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#ovtta%>t K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#ovtta%>ide K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#ovtta%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIOKTA
okta+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#akta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Nom:e%>#logi#okta%> K ;
okta+Num+Ess:e%>#logi#okta%>n K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Acc:e%>#logi#okta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Gen:e%>#logi#ovtta»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc:e%>#logi#ovtta%>s K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:e%>#logi#ovtta%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
okta+Num+Sg+Ill:e%>#logi#okti%>j K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Nom:e%>#logi#ovtta%>t K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Acc:e%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Gen:e%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Ill:e%>#logi#ovtta%>ide K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Com:e%>#logi#ovtta%>jguin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIOKTA
okta+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#akta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta%>#logi#okta%> K ;
okta+Num+Ess:htta%>#logi#okta%>n K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi#okta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Gen:htta%>#logi#ovtta»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc:htta%>#logi#ovtta%>s K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi#ovtta%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
okta+Num+Sg+Ill:htta%>#logi#okti%>j K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta%>#logi#ovtta%> K ;
okta+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi#ovtta%>t K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logi#ovtta%>ide K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta%>#logi#ok'ta%>X5jd K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K ;
okta+Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logi#ovtta%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIGUOKTE
guokte+Num+Sg+Nom:%>#logi#guokte%> K ;
guokte+Num+Ess:%>#logi#guokti%>n K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Acc:%>#logi#guokte%> K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#guovtti%> K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#logi#guovtte»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Loc:%>#logi#guovtti%>s K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>#logi#guovtti%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
guokte+Num+Sg+Ill:%>#logi#guoktá%>j K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#guovtti%> K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>#logi#guovtti%> K ;
guokte+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#logi#guovtti%>t K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Acc:%>#logi#guok'te%>X5jd K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Gen:%>#logi#guok'te%>X5jd K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>#logi#guok'te%>X5jd K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>#logi#guok'te%>X5jd K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Ill:%>#logi#guvtti%>jde K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#guvtti%>jn K ;
guokte+Num+Pl+Com:%>#logi#guvtti%>jguin K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
guoktelogátlohkái:guok't GUOKTELOGATLOHKAI ;
njealljelogátlohkái:njeallj GUOKTELOGATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 21TO99
guoktelogi:guok't GUOKTELOGIOKTA ;
golbmalogi:golbma GOLBMALOGIOKTA ;
golbmalogi:golbma GOLBMALOGIGUOKTE ;
njealljelogi:njeallj GUOKTELOGIOKTA ;
vihttalogi:vi VIHTTALOGIOKTA ;
guhttalogi:gu VIHTTALOGIOKTA ;
čiežalogi:čieža GOLBMALOGIOKTA ;
giežalogi:gieža GOLBMALOGIOKTA ;
čiežalogi:čieža GOLBMALOGIGUOKTE ;
giežalogi:gieža GOLBMALOGIGUOKTE ;
gávccilogi:gák'ci GAVCCILOGIOKTA ;
ovccilogi:ok'ci GAVCCILOGIOKTA ;
LEXICON 111TO119
guoktelogátlohkái:guok't GUOKTELOGATLOHKAI ;
njealljelogátlohkái:njeallj GUOKTELOGATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON CUODI
čuođiguoktelogi:čuođi#guok't GUOKTELOGI  ;
čuođinjealljelogi:čuođi#njeallj GUOKTELOGI ;
oktačuohtiguoktelogi:okta#čuohti#guok't GUOKTELOGI ;
oktačuohtinjealljelogi:okta#čuohti#njeallj GUOKTELOGI ;
čuohtiguoktelogi:čuohti#guok't GUOKTELOGI ;
čuohtinjealljelogi:čuohti#njeallj GUOKTELOGI ;
LEXICON num-imprecise
moaddelogi:moadd GUOKTELOGI ;
gallelogi:gall GUOKTELOGI ;
